Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Division 2. Lights; Safety Equipment
§ 31-5-939.
Revocation of superintendent's approval; reapproval.

Whenever the superintendent has reason to believe that a device approved under W.S.

31-5-937

does not comply with his standards, he shall upon thirty (30) days notice to the one to whom the approval was issued conduct a hearing upon the question of the continued compliance of the approved device. After the hearing the superintendent shall determine whether the device meets the requirements of the applicable standard. If the device does not meet those requirements the superintendent shall give notice to the one to whom the approval has been issued of his intention to revoke the approval. If the holder of the approval fails to satisfy the superintendent that the device being sold or offered for sale meets the applicable standard within ten (10) days of the notice, the superintendent shall revoke the approval and shall require the withdrawal of all such devices from the market and may require that all devices sold since the notification be replaced by devices that do comply.

When an approval has been revoked pursuant to this section, the device shall not be again approved unless and until it has been submitted to reapproval and it has been demonstrated, in the same manner as in an application for an original approval, that the device fully meets the requirements of the applicable standard. The superintendent may require that all previously approved items are being effectively recalled and removed from the market as a condition for reapproval.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 132; C.S. 1945, § 60-732; W.S. 1957, § 31-201; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

§ 31-5-940.
Testing and enforcement program.

The highway department may purchase and test equipment described in W.S.

31-5-934

to determine whether it complies with its standards.

Upon identification of unapproved or substandard devices being sold or offered for sale, the superintendent shall give notice to the person selling them that he is in violation of W.S.

31-5-934

and that selling or offering them for sale is prohibited.

In order to enforce the prohibition against the sale or offer for sale of unapproved or substandard devices, the superintendent may file a petition in the district court to enjoin any further sale or offer of sale of the unapproved or substandard devices. Upon a prima facie showing that the device is of a type required to be approved by the superintendent, it has not been approved and it is being sold or offered for sale, the injunction shall be issued.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions generally, see chapter 28 of title 1 and Rule 65, W.R.C.P.